North Carolina, session 2025, SB715.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Community
Colleges System Office the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the State Board of Community Colleges to establish the
Student Voter Identification Grant Program (Program) to provide grants to community colleges
of up to twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per community college to upgrade necessary
equipment and facilities to produce student identification cards that can be used to vote in person
in accordance with G.S. 163-166.16. The State Board shall develop a process for receiving
applications from community colleges and award grants no later than August 15, 2025, to any
community college that submits a reasonable and timely plan for the expenditure of funds
consistent with the purposes of the Program. No community college shall receive more than one
grant under the Program. No later than February 15, 2026, the System Office shall report to the
Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee on the identity of the community colleges
receiving grants under the Program and the purchases made with the funds awarded.
SECTION 1.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the
State Board of Elections shall review and approve the application of any community college
receiving funds under the Student Voter Identification Grant Program established in subsection
(a) of this section that is submitted to the State Board by September 1, 2025, to have its student
identification cards approved for use as photo identification cards, if the application complies
with other requirements for such an application established by the State Board.
SECTION 2. It is the intent of the General Assembly (i) to encourage all community
colleges in the State that do not have student identification cards that can be used to vote in person
in accordance with G.S. 163-166.16 to apply to receive grants under the Student Voter
Identification Grant Program established pursuant to Section 1 of this act and (ii) that the Program
remove the existing financial barriers of community colleges to providing students with valid
photo identification for voting.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S715-v-1*